Ai2 Privacy Policy
Ai2 Privacy Policy & Notice
Last Updated: February 19, 2025
The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence (“
Ai2
” or “
we
”) is committed to maintaining your confidence and trust with respect to your privacy. Ai2 is a nonprofit research institution recognized as tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the U.S. tax code, and is organized and operated for charitable, scientific, and educational purposes under state and federal law. Please read this Privacy Policy & Notice (this “
Privacy Notice
”) carefully to understand how we collect, store, use, share, and disclose personal data (i.e., personal information) from and about you or our Users (as defined below) in connection with our Services, as defined in our posted
Terms of Use
(the “Services”). Ai2 is the data controller for purposes of processing of your personal data, if any, when you use the Services or our Sites (as defined below). For information on how to contact Ai2 as the data controller, please see the ‘Contact Us’ section below.
You must accept our binding Terms, as defined in our posted
Terms of Use
, to use our Sites and the Services, and are strongly encouraged to read the Terms in addition to this Privacy Notice.
About this Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice applies only to this website (allenai.org) and our other websites, apps (including our mobile apps provided through various App Stores, including Apple’s App Store and Google’s Play), services, and events, including events that refer or link to this Privacy Notice (each, a “
Site
” and together, collectively, the “
Sites
”), and to any other personal information obtained when you email, interact, or otherwise communicate with Ai2 or use our Sites.
This Privacy Notice describes the types of information we collect through our Sites, how we use such information, and to whom and under what circumstances we may disclose it, including how we share any personal data that we may collect with third-party companies or service providers that help us process information and support our Sites and the Services (collectively, “
Third-Party Providers
”). It also describes your choices regarding use, access, and correction of your personal information as well as your data subject rights if you are an individual residing in the European Economic Area and/or the United Kingdom.
When you access our Sites on any computer, mobile phone, tablet, or other device (collectively, “
Device
”) or otherwise interact with Ai2 or our Sites, this Privacy Notice applies. Please read this Privacy Notice carefully to understand our practices about how we collect, use and share your personal information. This Privacy Notice may be supplemented by additional privacy statements, terms, or notices provided to you.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to any third-party applications or software that integrates with our Sites, the Services, or any other third-party products, services, or research, including without limitation the publisher of the app stores where you may download or otherwise access our Sites (collectively, “
Third-Party Services
”). The organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) that entered into any end-user license or other service agreement with Ai2 (in each case, the “
User
”) controls the content submitted through our Sites and any associated User Data, as defined in the applicable agreement (in each case, the “
User Agreement
”).
Changes to this Privacy Notice
Ai2 may change this Privacy Notice from time to time. Laws, regulations, and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our research or educational programs. We will post the changes to this page and encourage you to review our Privacy Notice to stay informed. In general, we will endeavor to provide prompt additional notice (e.g., via email or through the Sites) one month prior to the date the changes will become effective, if such changes are substantial. If you disagree with the changes to this Privacy Notice, you should deactivate your account and immediately cease using our Sites.
Categories of Information We Collect
We collect personal data about you and our Users in three ways: (i) information provided directly to us by you or our Users; (ii) information provided to us from third-party sources; and (iii) information collected by automated technologies when you use our Sites or the Services.
Information provided directly to us
: We explain here what categories of personal data we collect directly from you or our Users, the source of this information and purpose of collection, and the recipients of this information (if any), and the legal basis for collecting and processing this information:
A.
Contact information
: This category of personal data includes name, email address, postal address, phone number, social media handle, or Open Researcher and Contributor ID (ORCID), if applicable.
Source
: From you or our Users when they visit our Sites, call us, sign-up for emails or another service, or otherwise interact with the Services or engage with us on social media platforms.
Purpose
: To communicate with and respond to our you and our Users about the Services we offer, our support for the Services, to provide our Services, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, including verification of identity or to meet legal obligations.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers that help us with selected marketing, information technology, or research and development services.
Legal Basis
: To provide you with the Services or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, or based on prior consent by you or our Users when accessing, engaging, or using our Sites and the Services (when and if such consent is requested).
B.
Account information and preferences (if requested and provided by you or our Users)
: This category of personal data includes account login credentials, such as usernames and passwords, password hints and similar security information; other account registration and profile information, including educational, professional and other background information, such as your field of study, current position, affiliation, academic homepage, practice area and areas of interests, and photo; communications preferences, such as your preferred language and the frequency, type and format of the alerts you sign up to receive. Please note that these account information and preferences are not collected through all our Sites and only if you use our Sites and Services.
Source
: If and to the extent that we collect this account information and preferences, we collect them from you or our Users when you register for or update an account on our Sites (if any), use accounts on our Sites, or otherwise interact with us, you, or other Users in connection with accounts on our Sites or the Services.
Purpose
: To allow you and our Users to register and maintain their accounts and for us to provide the Services to you or our Users, to deliver communications and otherwise assist with accounts, to provide and support our Sites, and to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers who help us facilitate account log in and with website analytics, marketing, and activity on our Sites and access to the Services.
Legal Basis
: To support your access to and use of certain portions or functionality of the Services, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement
C.
User submissions
: This category of personal data includes information that you or our Users communicate to us, such as questions or information you or our users send to us at
ai2-info@allenai.org
,
feedback@semanticscolar.org
,
legal@allenai.org
, as well as information communicated to us through our Sites, leaderboards, newsletter subscription, web forms and other online submissions; data that you or our Users provide to us as part of interacting with our Services, including for example your saved papers, email alerts, favorites, search queries, and prompts you enter into our AI demonstrations on our Sites and the information included in such prompts, and other information you or our Users consent to providing us to access and use the Services.
Source
: From directly from you or our Users when they use our Sites, call us, communicate with us, sign-up for emails or another service, or otherwise interact with us or the AI demonstrations on our Sites or the Services.
Purpose
: Improve the Sites and our Services, respond to queries, and inform you and our Users about new services, to support the Sites and provide you with the Services, to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, and also identify new potential users and partners.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers that help us with selected marketing, information technology, or research and development services. Should you decide to share the prompts you have entered into our AI demonstrations, those inputs may be first transmitted to one of our partners who collects this data on our behalf and then passes it on to us so that we can review your prompts to improve the Services and conduct research and educational programs.
Legal Basis
: Our legitimate interest to manage, protect and ensure the integrity and security of our Sites as well as to improve the Services provided on our Sites. The processing of this information will be carried out to support you or Users of the Sites, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, for example, if we communicate with you in relation to our Sites or the Services (e.g. responses to user submission or requests), or if we store data provided by You or our Users in the course of using of our Sites or the Services (e.g. papers, email alerts, favorites, or search queries). When you register for our newsletter, we process your personal data exclusively on the basis of your consent. Insofar as you provide us with prompts you enter into our AI demonstrations, we process any personal data included in those prompts exclusively based on your consent and to improve our AI demonstrations for research and educational purposes.
D.
Browsing Information
: This category of personal data includes information such as: IP address; MAC address or other User identifier (e.g. IMEI number or International Mobile Equipment Identity Number); the unique number of the carrier (e.g. IMSI or International Mobile Subscriber Identity); mobile phone number (e.g. MSISDN or Mobile Station International Subscriber Directory Number); the kind of browser or computer you our Users use; the pages and content that you and our Users visit on our Sites, click on, view, or choose not to click on or view; the state and country from which you or our Users access our Sites; the date and time of visit, web pages you or our Users linked to our Sites from; and browsing and search history.
Source
: Our Sites and your interactions with the Sites, including through the use of cookies and other tracking technologies explained further below.
Purpose
: To evaluate usage of our Sites and improve performance of the Sites and our services; to protect the security and integrity of the Sites and our research or educational programs, such as preventing fraud, hacking, and other criminal activity or to meet legal obligations.
Potential Recipients
: Our Third-Party Providers who help us with fraud protection, website analytics, marketing, and activity on our Sites.
Legal Basis
: To manage, protect, and ensure the integrity and security of our Sites as well as to improve the Services.
E.
Suspected crime information
: This category of personal data includes information such as you our Users’ identity, image, name, and address, suspected or alleged thefts, fraud, assault or other criminal behavior.
Source
: From crime and fraud prevention agencies, from you or our Users, witnesses, and from the police or law enforcement authorities.
Purpose
: To protect you, our Users, the public, and our research or educational programs against risks and crime.
Potential Recipients
: Law enforcement and other governmental authorities in accordance with applicable law, and our professional advisors.
Legal Basis
: To protect you, our Users, third parties, and us from crimes, fraud, and to ensure the integrity and security of our Sites. The processing of this information is based on, and necessary for, complying with legal obligations and requirements applicable to us that may arise from, for example, a request from law enforcement or other governmental authority to share this category of information. When we share this category of information with our professional advisors, the processing is based on our legitimate interests in protecting you, our Users, and our Sites and the Services.
Third-Party Sources
: We also may obtain personal data and other information about you or our Users from our affiliates and subsidiaries, as well as from third parties, including: (1) Third-Party Providers; and (2) publicly-available sources and data suppliers from which we obtain data to validate or supplement the information we hold or to otherwise use in connection with operating our Sites, the Services, and our research or educational programs.
A. This category of personal data includes information we gather from public websites, author name information, affiliation, email addresses (from our publisher partners, aggregated data from our Third-Party Providers, metadata from conference partnerships or other providers, and web crawls. This data may be combined with other information we collect and might include aggregate level data, such as which IP addresses correspond to zip codes or countries.
B. Typically, Third-Party Services are software that integrates with our Sites, and User can permit their authorized users to enable and disable these integrations. Once enabled, the provider of Third-Party Services may share certain information with Ai2. Authorized users should check the privacy settings and notices in these Third-Party Services to understand what data may be disclosed to Ai2. When Third-Party Services are enabled, Ai2 is authorized to connect and access other information made available to Ai2 in accordance with our agreement with the Third-Party Provider. Ai2 does not, however, receive or store passwords for any of these Third-Party Services when connecting them to our Sites.
Automated Technologies
: Our Sites may also automatically collect information about how you and our Users to interact with the Sites, and the Devices you and our Users use to access and use the Services. such as:
A. This category of personal data includes information includes:
Device and connection information, including IP address, browser type and version, operating system and other software installed on the Device accessing the Site or the Services, unique Device identifier, and other technical identifiers;
Usage data and performance information, including settings selected, features used, URL clickstream data, date and time stamp information, referring and exit pages, pages visited, error reports, and performance data, and other activity logs on the Sites;
For educational Sites, the course modules and test questions viewed, answered, or completed; and
For location-aware Sites, the physical location of the Device.
B. We collect and process this data based on our legitimate interests described in the ‘How We Use Collected Information’ section, based on prior consent by you or our Users (to the extent that this data contains personal data), or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement.
How We Use Collected Information
We may use your personal data and the information we collected as permitted or required by law, as described in more detail in this section.
Legitimate Interests
: We may process the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for the purpose of advancing any of the following interests, programs, or activities:
A. To conduct scientific research and to educate the general public;
B. To operate, enhance, and improve our Sites, the Services, and develop new programs and services supported by the Sites, and to develop and provide search, learning, and productivity tools and additional features on our Sites and with the Services.
C. To provide our Sites and the Services to you, to communicate with you about your use of our Sites and the Services, to respond to your inquiries, provide you with documentation or communications you requested and for other user service purposes (e.g., technical support, responding to queries or complaints);
D. To tailor the content and information that we may send or display to you and our Users, such as customized content and other personalization to make our Site and the Services more efficient for you and more relevant to your interests and geography, personalized help and instructions, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites and the Services;
E. To administer and manage performance of agreements with our Third-Party Providers or any User Agreements our Users;
F. To evaluate, maintain, monitor performance, and troubleshoot our Sites and the Services (including by monitoring and analyzing usage trends, access to, and use of our Sites and the Services), and to conduct data analysis or statistical inference about use of our Sites and the Services, including for the purposes of future research and development, audits, reporting, business operations, and other scientific or educational purposes;
G. For marketing and promotional purposes, for example, we may use your email address to send you news and newsletters, special offers, promotions, or to otherwise contact you about our Sites, the Services, or information we think may interest you;
H. To better understand how users access and use our Sites and the Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis, in order to improve our Sites and the Services and respond to user desires and preferences, and for other research, scientific, educational, and analytical purposes;
I. To administer surveys and questionnaires;
J. To protect and ensure the quality, security integrity and safety of our Sites and the Services, our operations, and our confidential and proprietary technology and information;
K. To prevent, detect, investigate, and address actual or suspected fraud, violation of law or our Terms, claims and other liabilities, or any threat of physical or financial harm to u, our staff or any other individuals or entities; and
L. As may be otherwise disclosed at the time of collection.
Enforcement of Our Rights
: We may process the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for the purpose of protecting and defending our rights, property, or safety of Ai2 or third parties, including enforcing contracts or policies, or in connection with investigating and preventing fraud or security issues, in the following ways:
A. Provide technical, demonstration, and other support and help to keep our Sites and the Services working, safe and secure;
B. Investigate and help prevent security issues and abuse;
C. Conduct and administer user testing and surveys;
D. Prevent or address service errors;
E. Address security or technical issues; and/or
F. Contact you to inform you about in our Sites, the Services, and other important Site-related notices (e.g. security, fraud, or change notices).
Legal and Corporate Compliance
: We may use the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements required by applicable law, legal process or regulation (including addressing access requests).
Scientific, Research, and Educational Purposes
: Ai2 may use the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for any business purpose, including without limitation Ai2’s scientific research and educational purposes, provided that the information we collect is aggregated or de-identified so it is no longer reasonably associated with an identified or identifiable natural person. Our Users determine their own policies and practices for the sharing and disclosure of information. Ai2 does not control how the Users or any other third parties choose to share or disclose information.
Cookies
Like many websites, Ai2 analyzes how visitors use our Sites through what is known as “cookie” technology or similar tracking tools (“
Cookies
”). A Cookie can be a small text file that is placed on your computer when you access our Sites and allows us to recognize you each time you visit the Sites. We may use cookies to: (i) allow you to use our Sites without having to re-enter your username and password; (ii) enhance or personalize your Site usage and experience; (iii) monitor and track your Site usage; (iv) manage our Sites; and (v) understand, improve, and research AI demonstrations, features and services, including to create logs and record when you access our Sites from different Devices, such as your work computer or your mobile device, and to provide you with interest-based ads. For more information on our advertising, see below: ‘Interest-Based Advertising.’ Unless the cookies are technically necessary and unless otherwise stated, we only use cookies with your prior consent. Further information on the cookies we use and the data processed through the use of these cookies can be found in our cookie notice below.
You can control cookies through your browser’s settings and other tools. However, if you choose to block certain cookies, you may not be able to register, login, or access certain parts or make full use of the pages and features that are currently on our Sites, or that we may put on our Sites in the future. Note that browser-management tools for cookies are outside of our control and we cannot guarantee their effectiveness. We may combine the information we collect through cookies, web beacons, or other technology tools with other information we have collected from you or information from other sources.
Interest-Based Advertising
We may use third-party advertising companies that use tracking technologies to serve our advertisements across the Internet. These companies may collect information about your visits to and use of our Sites and other websites and your interaction with our advertising and other communications. These advertising companies serve ads on behalf of us and others on non-affiliated sites, and some of those ads may be personalized, meaning that they are intended to be relevant to you based on information collected about your visits to the Sites and elsewhere over time.
You have the choice to tell us not to collect and use this information, and in some jurisdictions, we will only engage in interest-based advertising if you opt-in. If you would like more information about this practice and to know your choices concerning interest-based ads, visit:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
or
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
Should you reside in the European Union or the United Kingdom, with your prior express consent, we may use the following tracking technologies to serve our advertisements across the internet and tailored to your interests.
Google Analytics
: We may use the ‘Google Analytics’ analysis tool on our Sites, a web tracking service provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA (“
Google
”). The purpose of our use of the tool is to enable the analysis of your and our Users’ interactions on websites and in apps and to improve our offers and make them more interesting for you and our Users by means of the statistics and reports obtained.
We primarily use cookies, Device and browser data, IP addresses, and our Sites activities to track the interaction between you/our Users and the Sites. Google Analytics also records your IP addresses to ensure the security of the service and to provide us with information about the country, region or city from which the respective user originates (so-called IP localization). However, for your protection, we use the anonymization function (IP masking), i.e. Google shortens the IP addresses within the European Union/European Economic Area by the last octet.
Regarding the collection and processing of your personal data, Google acts as an independent controller within the meaning of Article 4(7) of the GDPR.
Further information on the scope of Google Analytics’ services can be found at:
https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/analytics/terms/us/
.
Information on data processing when using Google Analytics is provided by Google at the following link:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en&sjid=18322672776052043081-EU
.
General information on data processing, which according to Google also apply to Google Analytics, can be found in Google's privacy policy at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de
.
The legal basis for the collection and further processing of the information, which takes place for a maximum of 14 months, is your prior consent. You can withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. In apps, you can reset the advertising ID in the Android or iOS settings. The easiest way to withdraw consent is to notify us or to install the Google browser add-on, which is available via the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de/
.
Please note that the level of data protection outside the European Union and the European Economic Area may not be the same as in the European Union. In particular, if the data is transferred to the United States, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes.
Google relies on the European Commission's adequacy decisions in accordance with Art. 45 GDPR to justify the legality of the transfer of your personal data to third countries.
These adequacy decisions can be accessed on the following website of the European Commission, available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en
.
In particular, for the transfer of your personal data to the United States, Google relies on its certification under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/system/files/2023-07/Adequacy%20decision%20EU-US%20Data%20Privacy%20Framework_en.pdf
.
In its privacy policy, Google states that, by means of this certification, it has declared its compliance with the principles of the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and its recognition of the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission.
The certification applies in particular to Google LLC and its subsidiaries in the United States (unless these are expressly excluded) and can be reviewed at:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/participant-detail?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active0000001L5AAI&status=Active&hl=de
.
If the European Commission has not issued an adequacy decision with respect to the recipient state to which your personal data is transferred, Google will base the lawfulness of the transfer to companies based in such states on the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission and agreed with the recipient companies.
YouTube Video Embeds
: With your consent, we may use the YouTube plugin, provided by YouTube LLC, 01 Cherry Ave., San Bruno, CA 94066, USA (hereinafter ‘YouTube’). We use the YouTube plug-in to embed YouTube videos on our Sites (if applicable). When you visit our Sites, your browser or Device connects to YouTube's servers. This may result in personal data being stored and evaluated, in particular your activity and our Users’ activity (in particular which websites and (sub-)pages have been visited and which elements have been clicked on) as well as Device and browser information (in particular the IP address and operating system). This may cause data being transferred to Google servers in the United States. We have no influence on the content of the plug-in. If you are logged into your YouTube account while visiting our Sites and we use the YouTube Plugin on the Site visited, YouTube can associate your online presence visit with your account. By interacting with this plug-in, the corresponding information is transmitted directly to YouTube and stored there. YouTube can store your data as a user profile and use it for advertising and marketing, as well as for the customized design of its website.
Further information on the collection and storage of data by Google can be found here:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=DE&hl=en
We use YouTube to improve user-friendliness and to present our Sites in an appealing way.
The legal basis for the collection and further processing of the information is your prior consent. You can withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. In apps, you can reset the advertising ID in the Android or iOS settings. The easiest way to withdraw consent is to notify us or to install the Google browser add-on, which is available via the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de/
.
Please note that the level of data protection outside the European Union and the European Economic Area may not be the same as in the European Union. In particular, if the data is transferred to the United States, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes.
Since the YouTube plugin is operated in Europe by Google Ireland Ltd., the above information concerning the transfer of your personal data to third countries outside the EU and the EEA by Google, in particular regarding the existence of an adequacy decision and the use of standard contractual clauses, apply accordingly.
No Obligation to Provide Personal Data
You and our Users are under no legal or contractual obligation to provide us with your personal data; however, we may be limited in our ability to provide certain Sites or the Services or even be unable to provide them at all if you do not provide the necessary data. We will indicate whether the provision of personal data is required either by law or by contract, as applicable, upon collection.
Disclosure of Your Information
Ai2 may disclose your personal information depending on the way you or our Users interact with us, our Sites, and the Services. We may disclose information collected from and about you as follows:
To our related companies and Third-Party Providers, to perform research or educational activities, to provide professional or technical support function for us and to provide you with the Services or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement;
With your consent, to our marketing partners or Third-Party Providers in connection with marketing our current and future product and service offerings;
Based on our legitimate interest and as necessary if we believe that there has been a violation of any Site terms of use or of our rights or the rights of any third party;
In order to comply with our legal obligations, we disclose your personal data to respond to legal process (such as a search warrant, subpoena or court order) and provide information to law enforcement agencies or in connection with an investigation on matters related to public safety, as permitted by law, or otherwise as required by law; and
In the event that substantially all of Ai2’s assets are acquired, your personal information may be one of the transferred assets. Any data processing in this instance is based on our legitimate interests in transferring our assets.
We may also disclose your personal information with your express consent. If information is aggregated or de-identified so it is no longer reasonably associated with an identified or identifiable natural person, Ai2 may share it with third parties without restriction. Please note that if you voluntarily submit any personal information for posting on our Sites or through the Services in a public forum (e.g. comments on a blog post), such public interactions with Ai2 on our Sites or through the Services will make that information publicly available and can be collected and used by others; accordingly, please use care before posting information about yourself or any User online. We cannot control the actions of others with whom you may choose to share your information, and Ai2 cannot and does not guarantee that your information shared in a public forum on our Sites or through the Services will not be viewed by unauthorized persons. You understand that when you use public areas of our Sites or the Services, your information and any User information will be available to other users in some cases may be publicly available. We are not responsible for the personal information you choose to share in these public areas or for the actions of any third parties with whom you share personal information.
Access, Correction, and Deletion, Data Subject Rights under the GDPR
We respect your right to access and correct your personal information. You may exercise your rights, subject to applicable laws, to request that we delete or restrict access to your personal data. We may need to retain it for legally permitted purposes and this will be explained to you if necessary. In addition, if you have claimed your author page in our Semantic Scholar service (“
Semantic Scholar
”) as described in the ‘Service Specific Details’ section below, you may access your personal information by signing into your account. From there, you can correct or modify your information. If you need assistance correcting or updating your personal information, or would like to request that we delete your personal information, please contact us using the contact information detailed in the ‘Contact’ section below.
Provided that you reside in the European Economic Area or the United Kingdom, or that GDPR otherwise applies, you have the following data subject rights in accordance with the EU GDPR (EU Regulation no. 2016/679) or UK GDPR (UK Data Protection Act 2018) (together, along with any revision or substation thereof, “
GDPR
”):
Right to access personal data.
You have a right to request that we provide you with a copy of your personal data that we hold and you have the right to be informed of: (a) the controller’s identity; (b) the purposes, legal basis and methods of processing; (c) the source of your personal data; (d) the entities or categories of entities to whom your personal data may be transferred; and (e) where possible, the envisaged period for which the personal data will be stored, or, if not possible, the criteria used to determine that period. In order to submit such request, please see the ‘Contact’ section below.
Right to rectify or erase personal data.
You have a right to request that we rectify inaccurate personal data. We may seek to verify the accuracy of the personal data before rectifying it. You can also request that we erase your personal data in limited circumstances where:
it is no longer needed for the purposes for which it was collected as described above;
you have withdrawn your consent (where the processing was based on consent), and where there is no other legal ground for the processing;
you successfully lodged a right to object (see ‘Right to Object’ section below);
it has been processed unlawfully; or
needed to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject.
We are not required to comply with your request to erase personal data if the processing of your personal data is necessary:
for compliance with a legal obligation; or
for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; or
for performance of a contract.
Right to restrict the processing of your personal data.
You can ask us to restrict your personal data, where:
its accuracy is contested, to allow us to verify its accuracy;
the processing is unlawful, but you do not want it erased;
it is no longer needed for the purposes for which it was collected, but we still need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
you have exercised the right to object, and verification of overriding grounds is pending.
We can continue to use your personal data following a request for restriction, where:
we have your consent;
to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
to protect the rights of another natural or legal person.
Right to transfer your personal data.
You can ask us to provide your personal data to you in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, or you can ask to have it transferred directly to another controller, where:
the processing is based on your consent or the performance of a contract with you; and
the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data.
You can object to any processing of your personal data which has our legitimate interests as its legal basis, if you believe your fundamental rights and freedoms outweigh our legitimate interests. If you raise an objection, we have an opportunity to demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate interests which override your rights and freedoms.
Right to object to how we use your personal data for direct marketing purposes.
You can request that we change the manner in which we contact you for marketing Purposes. You can request that we do not transfer your personal data to unaffiliated third parties for the Purposes of direct marketing or any other purposes.
Right to obtain a copy of personal data safeguards used for transfers outside your jurisdiction.
You can ask to obtain a copy of, or reference to, the safeguards under which your personal data is transferred outside of the European Economic Area or the UK. We may redact data transfer agreements to protect commercial terms.
Right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority.
You have a right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority (a list of EU and UK national data protection authorities can be found
here
(EU) and
here
(UK)) if you have concerns about how we are processing your personal data. We ask that you please attempt to resolve any issues with us first, although you have a right to contact your supervisory authority at any time.
Your Rights and Choices.
Subject to certain exemptions, and in some cases dependent upon the processing we are undertaking, you have certain rights in relation to your personal data. We may ask you for additional information to confirm your identity and for security purposes, before disclosing the personal data requested to you. We reserve the right to charge a fee where permitted by law, for instance if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive.
You can exercise your rights through any means, including by contacting us at
legal@allenai.org
. Subject to legal and other permissible considerations, we will make every reasonable effort to honor your request promptly or inform you if we require further information in order to fulfil your request.
In accordance with Art. 21 GDPR, you have the right to object to the processing of your data, provided that the reason for the objection arises from your particular situation and it concerns data that we process to protect one of our interests worthy of protection or if it concerns the use of your data for direct marketing.
If you have given us consent to process your personal data, you can withdraw this consent at any time without providing reasons and with effect for the future at the email address provided above under the contact details.
No Fee Usually Required.
We do not charge a fee to give you access to your personal data or to exercise any of the other rights described above. We may, however, charge a reasonable fee if your request for access is clearly unfounded or excessive or we may refuse to comply with the request.
Data Retention
We retain your personal information that we collect, access or process only for as long as necessary for the fulfillment of the purposes for which it was collected unless otherwise provided in agreements between you and Ai2 or as required or authorized by law (in particular as required by statutory retention periods). Personal information that is no longer required to fulfill the identified purposes will be destroyed, erased or made de-identified.
Data Security
We work hard to protect information you provide from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access or disclosure. We consider the sensitivity of the information we collect, process and store, and the current state of technology. We follow generally accepted standards designed to protect the information submitted to us, both during transmission and once it is received. Given the nature of communications and information processing technology, Ai2 cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, will be absolutely safe from intrusion by others. The safety and security of your information also depends on you. Where Ai2 has given you (or where you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Sites, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share your password with anyone, and we urge you to be careful about giving out information in public areas of the websites like message boards. The information you share in public areas may be viewed by any user of our Sites.
Third-Party Websites
The Sites may contain links to, or other options to redirect to or integrate with, third-party websites, such as (but not limited to) social media sites like Facebook and X (formerly known as Twitter), which may have privacy policies that differ from our own. We are not responsible for the activities and practices that take place on these websites. Accordingly, we recommend that you review the privacy policy posted on any external site before disclosing any personal information. Please contact those websites directly if you have any questions about their privacy policies.
Locations of Processing
Your information will be stored and processed by Ai2 in the United States. We take steps, including through contracts, to ensure that the information continues to be protected wherever it is located in a manner consistent with the standards of protection required under applicable law. If you are visiting our Sites from outside the United States, your information may be transferred to, stored and processed in the United States or other countries in accordance with this Privacy Notice. Where personal information is transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or Switzerland, we rely on appropriate safeguards such as the European Commission-approved Standard Contractual Clauses and Data Privacy Frameworks to transfer the data and/or as otherwise authorized by applicable law. The data protection and other applicable laws of the United States or other countries may not be as comprehensive as those laws or regulations in your country or may otherwise differ from the data protection or consumer protection laws in your country. Your information may be available to government authorities under lawful orders and law applicable in such jurisdictions. Further information on the safeguards implemented by us, can be requested by email at:
legal@allenai.org
.
Contact
If you have any questions, comments, complaints or requests regarding this Privacy Notice or our processing of your information, please contact us at the following:
By Mail:
The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence
2157 North Northlake Way, Suite 110
Seattle, WA. 98103
Attn: Legal Department
By Email:
legal@allenai.org
If we need, or are required, to contact you concerning this Privacy Notice or any event that involves your information, we may do so by email, or mail.
Children Under the Age of 16
Our Sites are not intended for children under 16 years of age. No one under age 16 may provide any information to or on our Sites. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16 without verifiable parental consent. If you are under 16, do not use or provide any information on our Sites or on or through any of its features, make any purchases through the Sites, use any of the interactive or public comment features of this Sites or provide any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, e-mail address or any screen name or username you may use. If you believe we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us using the contact information detailed in the ‘Contact’ section above and we will delete that information immediately.
Service-Specific Details
Semantic
Scholar
: Please read the service-specific details below for additional information about Ai2’s project, Semantic Scholar (
https://www.semanticscholar.org/
), which apply to Semantic Scholar in addition to this Privacy Notice:
A. We collect author names as publicly accessible metadata from the web, publishers, and other sources for display across our website including in association with papers, presentations, blog posts, code repositories, videos and citations/references. This data and content can be removed for display from our public-facing website by removing the associated content (note: we currently only have removal tools for presentations, papers, figures and tables). Removal does not result in deletion of the underlying paper or publication attributed to the author, which is fixed by the original source material.
B. We use the author name from this publicly accessible metadata to auto-generate author pages where we display content associated with an author, compute citation statistics and display links to other authors.
C. Author profile pages can be updated by using the ‘Claim Author Page’ button on an author’s page to add/remove papers, add an affiliation, add a link to a homepage and add an ORCID ID to an author’s profile. Requesters who submit changes are required to provide their first and last name, e-mail address and justification which we store in a database to validate the request. You have the ability to un-claim a profile.
D. We provide multiple options to sign in via third-party providers such as, for example, Google, Facebook, Twitter, and OpenAthens. As part of the sign-in process we collect and store the data such as username, screen name, auth token, affiliation. Please contact us if you’d like further information about the data provided by your sign in provider.
Skylight
. For information about how we collect, use and share your personal information in connection with our Skylight services, please review the
Skylight Privacy Policy
.
EarthRanger
. For information about how we collect, use, and share your personal information in connection with our EarthRanger services, please review the
EarthRanger Privacy Policy
.
Version History
February 2025 (Current Version)
Update as of February 19, 2025.
July 2022
Transcription of existing privacy policy to MD, done as of July 21, 2022.
June 2021
Update as of June 1, 2021
August 2020
Update as of Aug 25, 2020
April 2020
Update as of April 2, 2020
July 2018
Original version.
Version History
February 2025
(Current Version)
Update as of February 19, 2025.
July 2022
Transcription of existing privacy policy to MD, done as of July 21, 2022.
June 2021
Update as of June 1, 2021
August 2020
Update as of Aug 25, 2020
April 2020
Update as of April 2, 2020
July 2018
Original version.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://commission.europa.eu/system/files/2023-07/Adequacy%20decision%20EU-US%20Data%20Privacy%20Framework_en.pdf:
Skip to main content
This site uses cookies. Visit our
cookies policy page
or click the link in any footer for more information and to change your preferences.
Accept all cookies
Accept only essential cookies
An official website of the European Union
An official EU website
How do you know?
All official European Union website addresses are in the
europa.eu
domain.
See all EU institutions and bodies
You are not authorized to access this page.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/participant-detail?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active0000001L5AAI&status=Active&hl=de:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 3
https://skylight.global/Privacy-Policy.aspx:
Platform
How it Works
Visualizing what’s happening at sea to enhance decisions
Utilizing AI
Transforming what you know, when you need to know
Events
Automating detections to accelerate action
API
Seamless integration to drive impact
News
How it Works
Surfacing suspicious activities at sea for action
Utilizing AI
Transforming what you know, when you need to know
Events
Automating detections to accelerate decision-making
Case Studies
See real-world examples of our impact in addressing illegal fishing
Partners
About
Our Story
Fulfilling the vision of our founder, Paul G. Allen
Our Mission
Tackling illegal fishing with premier data and AI-driven analytics
Our Team
Meet our passionate engineers, AI researchers, and product managers
Our Connections
Skylight is just one part of the larger AI2 family
Resources
Skylight Resource Center
Your go-to resource for everything Skylight
Virtual Training
An overview of Skylight's functionality.
Videos
Educational guides with step-by-step instructions.
Release Notes
Updates and announcements that are released monthly.
FAQs
Everything you want to know about Skylight.
Resources
Contact Us
Contact Us
Log In
Last Updated: March 1, 2024
This Privacy Policy describes the Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence’s (“AI2”) online data policies and practices in connection with the Skylight Services. When you access or use the Skylight Services, you consent to AI2’s collection, use, and disclosure of your information as described in this Privacy Policy. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Privacy Policy have the meanings given in the
Skylight End User License Agreement
(EULA).
The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence (“AI2”) is committed to maintaining your confidence and trust with respect to your privacy. Please read this privacy policy carefully to understand our practices about how we collect, use and share your personal information.
What this Privacy Policy Covers
This Privacy Policy applies to the information collected through your use of the Skylight Services, which is a separate platform and web application from the general Skylight™ marketing and informational site found on AI2’s website at
https://skylight.global/
(“Site”). Your use of the Site is governed by AI2’s
Terms and Conditions of Use
and
Privacy Policy
Information AI2 Collects
“Personal information”
is information that can personally identify you, such as your name or email address. Personal information also includes other data that can reasonably be linked to your personally identifiable information. You can directly or indirectly provide your personal information through your use of the Skylight Services. The following describes the types of personal information we may collect:
User Account:
When you sign up for a User Account, AI2 stores the personal information you provide with the account creation form, such as your full name, email address, organization name, job title, and your state or country of residence. AI2 will use your account information to provide the Skylight Services to you, including any associated technical, administrative and support services. AI2 will also use the contact information linked to your User Account to send you legal notices and other communications regarding the Skylight Services as may be necessary to comply with applicable laws.
Features:
If you opt-in, subscribe or enable certain Features to receive Alerts, AI2 stores the contact information you provide, such as your email address. AI2 will use your contact information for the purpose of sending Alerts and communications for the Features you have enabled.
Browsers and devices:
AI2 collects certain information about the browsers and devices you use to access the Skylight Services, including unique identifiers. Unique identifiers are cookie files used to uniquely identify a browser or device. Please see the section below on “Cookies” for more information.
IP address.
AI2 collects your Internet Protocol (IP) address whenever you access the Skylight Services, which is a number automatically assigned to your computer or device when you browse the internet. These numbers are usually assigned based on geography, so an IP address can often be used to identify the general geographic area of where a device is connecting to the internet. AI2 uses your IP address to administer and address technical issues with the Skylight Services.
Use statistics.
AI2 collects information about how your browsers and devices interact with the Skylight Services, including crash reports, system activity, and the date, time and referrer URL (the webpage you came from if you clicked a link to access the Skylight Services). AI2 also collects statistical information about user activity on the Skylight Services, including web traffic, and the date, time, duration and number of visits.
Feedback:
If you submit or provide any Feedback to AI2, you are solely responsible for its contents and any personal information you may disclose therein. Provision of any Feedback is at your own risk. AI2 does not knowingly collect or monitor Feedback for personal information, and may use Feedback in any manner without any obligation or limitation in accordance with the terms of the EULA. If AI2 discovers it has received any personal information in error, it will take steps to delete the data as soon as possible without notice to you.
Who Else Can Access Data within the Skylight Services:
In addition to AI2, organization admins can create and edit User Accounts on behalf of people in their organization. This information in the User Accounts added by the organization admin can thereafter be seen by internal AI2 system administrators as well as administrators from within their respective organization.
Cookies
“Cookies” are small pieces of data (text files) that are stored in the web browser on your device in order to remember information about you. Cookies are used to compile anonymous, aggregate statistics based information collected through the Skylight Services (“Aggregate Data”). AI2 uses cookies to administer and operate the Skylight Services, including site configuration and IT security. AI2 also uses cookies with Google Analytics and Google Tag Manager (referred together as “Google Web Tools”) for feedback and usage statistics to operate and improve the Skylight Services. AI2 uses use both “first party cookies” (cookies set by AI2) and “third party cookies” (cookies from another domain) as follows:
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
“Strictly Necessary Cookies” are cookies that are necessary for a website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems.
Performance Cookies.
“Performance Cookies” are cookies that allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of a website.
Targeting Cookies. “Targeting Cookies” are third party cookies that log the record and activity of websites you visit, such as the links you click. We employ Targeting Cookies with Google Analytics. These cookies send you a cookie file with a unique identifier, which is tracked with other cookies stored in your browser to log your browsing history over time. For more information about how Google Analytics uses cookies, please review the Google Analytics Cookie Guide.
Tags. We use third party JavaScript tags (code elements) to set the Performance Cookies. We manage the tags using Google Tag Manager, which is a tag management tool that integrates with Google Analytics to derive usage statistics and performance analytics.
In order to provide the Skylight Services to you, AI2 may use and share the Aggregate Data collected through the cookies with third parties. For example, Google Web Tools interact with other Google Inc. products and services in accordance with
Google’s Privacy Policy
. Please see the section below on “Managing Your Information” for ways to manage how your information is shared via Google Web Tools.
How Your Information is Used
Please see below on the circumstances where AI2n may share your personal information with others:
Service Providers:
AI2 may use third party providers to provide or support some of the services that are available through the Skylight Services. AI2 may also rely on third party providers to perform certain services for AI2 in connection with your use of the Skylight Services, such as, but not limited to, communications and hosting services, network security, technical and user support, tracking and reporting functions, quality assurance testing, and other functions. AI2 may share your information with these third party providers so that they can perform their services or complete your requests. These third party providers may share information with AI2 that they obtain from or about you in connection with providing their services or completing your requests. Some of Skylight Services web pages utilize framing techniques to serve content to you from our third party providers, while preserving the look and feel of the Skylight Services. In such cases, please note that the information you provide is being provided to the third party.
Business Transfers:
AI2 may share your information with its affiliated entities, prospective buyers, partners or joint ventures, in which case AI2 will require them to honor this Privacy Policy. If another company acquires AI2 or all or substantially all of its assets (e.g. merger, acquisition or sale), that company will possess the same information, and will assume the rights and obligations with respect to that information as described in this Privacy Policy.
Investigations:
AI2 may investigate and disclose your personal information if it has a good faith belief that such disclosure (a) is reasonably necessary to comply with legal process and law enforcement instructions and orders, such as a search warrant, subpoena, statute, judicial proceeding, or other legal process served on AI2; (b) is helpful to prevent, investigate, or identify possible fraud wrongdoing in connection with the Skylight Services; (c) is necessary to act under exigent circumstances to protect the safety of the public or users of the Skylight Services, (d) is reasonably necessary to protect AI2’s rights, reputation, property, or that of its users, affiliates, partners or the public.
Links:
The Skylight Services may contain links to unaffiliated third party services. If you visit any websites through those links, the collection and use of your information will be subject to such third party’s terms and privacy policy. AI2 is not responsible for the privacy practices of such third party services. Please review the privacy policies posted on any such third party services.
Managing Your Information
Google Web Tools
You can manage how your information is shared and used with Google Web Tools as follows:
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on.
Google has developed a browser add-on tool to enable visitors of websites with Google cookies and tags to prevent Google Analytics from receiving their information. This add-on will not prevent websites from collecting information through other first-party or third-party cookies and tags. You can download and install the
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
to begin using this tool.
Google settings.
In addition to above, you can manage how Google uses the information obtained through Google Web Tools and other cookies, and how it interacts with other Google products by changing the settings in your Google account. For example, you can restrict personalization features used in Google ads by changing your preference settings in your Google account to prevent use for targeted ads and content. Please review
Google’s Privacy Controls
for more general information on how you can configure various privacy and share settings through Google.
Third party tools.
Third parties have also developed mechanisms for opting out of various cookies that use and share information collected from Google Web Tools and other sources for advertising purposes. For US-based users, the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) WebChoices is a tool that enables you to view and manage the cookies used for online advertising. For EU-based users, there is Your Online Choices.
Compliance
Information collected from the Skylight Services will be stored and processed in the United States. If you are located outside of the United States and visit the Site, we may transfer your information outside of your country. Where personal information is transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or Switzerland, we rely on appropriate safeguards to transfer the data. The data protection and other applicable laws of the United States or other countries may not be as comprehensive as those laws or regulations in your country and may otherwise differ from the data protection or consumer protection laws in such jurisdictions.
Security
AI2 is committed to protecting the security of your information and follows generally accepted industry standards to protect the personal information it receives. However, no method of transmission over the Internet, devices, or cloud or electronic storage is 100% secure. Therefore, while AI2 strives to use commercially acceptable means to protect your personal information, AI2 cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Personal Information of Children
Skylight Services are intended for a general audience, and AI2 does not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16. If you become aware that a child has provided AI2 with personal information without parental consent, please contact AI2 at legal@allenai.org. If AI2 becomes aware that a child under 16 has provided personal information without parental consent, AI2 will take steps to delete such data as soon as possible.
European Union (EU) Residents: Your Privacy Rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
If you are located in the EU, we will collect personal information only if AI2 has one or more legal bases for doing so under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). The legal bases depend on your interaction with the Skylight Services. AI2 will only collect personal information from you where: (i) you have given your consent for one or more specific purposes; (ii) it is necessary to perform a contract we are about to enter into or have entered into with you; (iii) it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests; (iv) it is necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another natural person; or (v) it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation. Where we rely on your consent to process personal information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and where we rely on legitimate interests, you may have the right to object to our processing.
Data Subject Rights
If you are located in the EU, you can submit a request regarding your personal information to
legal@ai2.org
. To submit a request, you must provide certain information such as your first name, last name and email address, your relationship to AI2, and details about your request. AI2 will only use the information you provide to evaluate, process, fulfill or contact you regarding your request (e.g. to follow up or ask for additional details about your request). If the GDPR applies to your personal information, AI2 will provide an initial response within one (1) month of your submission date. Please note that if you provide incorrect or insufficient information, AI2 may not be able to fulfill your request.
Account Termination and Data Retention
You may close your User Account by contacting AI2 at support@skylight.global. Subject to fulfillment of any requests regarding your personal information as provided in the “Data Subject Rights” section above, AI2 may retain your personal information for the purposes as described in this Privacy Policy unless prohibited by law.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
AI2 may change this privacy policy from time to time. Laws, regulations and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our business. We will post the changes to this page and encourage you to review our privacy policy to stay informed. If we change the policy in a material and retroactive manner, AI2 will provide additional notice, such as via email or through the Sites. If you disagree with the changes to this privacy policy, you should deactivate your account and immediately cease using the Sites.
Contact
For any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact AI2 at
legal@ai2.org
.
Case Study
See how we stop illegal fishing in the Galapagos Islands
Learn More
Recent News
Allen Institute For AI pledges $3 million to accelerate the use of AI to address illegal fishing
Read Full Article
Interested in learning more?
Contact Us
Sub-policy 4
https://earthranger.com/Privacy-Policy:
Technology
Success Stories
News
Conservation Tech Award
Partners
About Us
FAQs
Contact Us
Support
Community
Request Demo
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: September 2023
‍
This EarthRanger™ Privacy Policy (this “
Privacy Policy
”) describes the online data policies and practices of The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence (
“Ai2”
) in connection with this website (i.e. earthranger.com) (the “Site”) and EarthRanger™ products and services (collectively, “
EarthRanger Products
”). When you access or use the EarthRanger Products, you consent to Ai2’s collection, use, and disclosure of your information as described in this Privacy Policy. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Privacy Policy have the meanings given in the
EarthRanger End User License Agreement
(the “
EarthRanger EULA
”).
‍
Ai2 is committed to maintaining your confidence and trust with respect to your privacy. Please read this privacy policy carefully to understand our practices about how we collect, use and share your personal information.
‍
What This Privacy Policy Covers
This policy differentiates between the Site and EarthRanger products. Please note what each section refers to specifically as you read.
The Site is Ai2’s general marketing and informational website for EarthRanger™. EarthRanger Products, on the other hand, refer to (a) the EarthRanger™ cloud-based, software-as-a-service Domain Awareness System and web application (“
SaaS Service
”), and (b) any other EarthRanger applications released by Ai2 that interoperate with the SaaS Service, such as mobile applications (
“Applications”
). This Privacy Policy differentiates between the Site and EarthRanger Products. Accordingly, references made below to the “Site” do not include “EarthRanger Products” and vice versa. Your use of the Ai2 website, allenai.org, is governed by Ai2’s
Terms and Conditions of Use
and
Privacy Policy
.
‍
Note on EarthRanger Products
This policy only applies to information regarding you, not your “Customer Data”.
If you are a customer or user of the SaaS Service and/or Applications,
this Privacy Policy does not apply to your “Customer Data”
as defined in the
EarthRanger EULA
and the
EarthRanger Customer Data and Privacy Policy
(collectively,
“EarthRanger Terms”
). With respect to EarthRanger Products, this Privacy Policy applies to information, other than Customer Data, that may be collected through your use of EarthRanger Products. This Privacy Policy supplements, but does not supersede the EarthRanger Terms. In the event of any conflict between the EarthRanger Terms and this Privacy Policy regarding your Customer Data, the EarthRanger Terms will govern.
‍
Information Ai2 Collects and Why it is Collected
"Personal information"
is information that can personally identify you, such as your name or email address. Personal information also includes other data that can reasonably be linked to your personally identifiable information. You can directly or indirectly provide your personal information through your use of the Site and EarthRanger Products. The following describes the types of personal information we may collect:
Contact Information:
This includes your email, name, and/or organization. This information may be used to contact you via email, phone, text message, or by other reasonable methods for various reasons, including providing support.
Site.
If you use the “Contact Us” form on the Site, you will be asked to provide your first name, last name, company name, country where you are located, email address, phone number and your comments. We will use the information you provide only for the purpose of contacting you about the question or comments you have submitted.
EarthRanger Products:
If you are a customer or user of the SaaS Service, you may provide personal information with your user account or when you opt-in or subscribe to optional features of the SaaS Service (e.g. SMS alerts), such as your first name, last name, email address and phone number. You may also provide your contact information when you request support services for EarthRanger Products. Ai2 will only use your contact information in accordance with the EarthRanger Terms to provide the EarthRanger Products to you, including any associated technical, administrative and support services.
Gundi:
Ai2 only processes machine-to-machine integration data. No user information is required or stored beyond a username, though the data represented in the Gundi integrations may represent your location.
Location:
a.
SaaS Service
. If you are a customer or user of the SaaS Service, the SaaS Service will prompt you to give permission to share your location. If you enable location sharing, the location data that is transmitted will be stored within the SaaS Service. We will only use such location data to provide the SaaS Service to you.
b.
Applications
. If you use an Application that employs global position system (GPS) technology, we collect the geolocation data transmitted through your device when you are logged into the Application. Since Applications interoperate with the SaaS Service, your location data from an Application may also transmit to the SaaS Service. Location data from the Application that is transmitted to the SaaS Service will be stored within the SaaS Service. Location data from your device may also be temporarily stored within the Application. For example, if you use the EarthRanger Track Application, the location data of your device’s last position is stored within the Application when you log out until the next time you log in. Upon your next login, the location data of your device’s last position is deleted within EarthRanger Track and we do not retain such historic location data within the Application.
Browsers and Devices:
Ai2 collects certain information about the browsers and devices you use to access the Site and EathRanger Products, including unique identifiers. Unique identifiers are cookie files used to uniquely identify a browser or device. Please see the section below on “Cookies” for more information.
IP Address:
Ai2 collects your Internet Protocol (IP) address whenever you access the Site or SaaS Service, which is a number automatically assigned to your computer or device when you browse the internet. These numbers are usually assigned based on geography, so an IP address can often be used to identify the general geographic area of where a device is connecting to the internet. Ai2 uses your IP address to administer and address technical issues with the SSite and EarthRanger Products.
Use Statistics:
Ai2 collects information about how your browsers and devices interact with the Site and EarthRanger Products, including crash reports, system activity, and the date, time and referrer URL (the webpage you came from if you clicked a link to access the Site or any EathRanger Products). Ai2 also collects statistical information about user activity on theSite and EarthRanger Products, including web traffic, and the date, time, duration and number of visits.
Feedback:
If you submit or provide any Feedback to Ai2, you are solely responsible for its contents and any personal information you may disclose therein. Provision of any Feedback is at your own risk. Ai2 does not knowingly collect or monitor Feedback for personal information, and may use Feedback in any manner without any obligation or limitation in accordance with the terms of the EarthRanger EULA. If Ai2 discovers it has received any personal information in error, it will take steps to delete the data as soon as possible without notice to you.
Workplace and Organization-Provided Information:
Others agreeing to our End-User License Agreement for our SaaS Services or Applications for your use, such as your employer or other organization, may provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Saas Services and Applications. For example, we may receive contact information for administrators and for authorizing users of our SaaS Service and Applications.
Other
:
a. Our products are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
b.
Research.
We seek to aid protected area managers, ecologists, and wildlife biologists in making more informed operational decisions for wildlife conservation. We may use personal data available to us to conduct research related to our product effectiveness in achieving our mission and conservation areas that could benefit from greater access to the products. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under controls that are designed to protect your privacy. We publish or allow others to publish results, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
c.
Security
. We may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of our End-User License Agreement and/or attempts to harm others.
Cookies
"Cookies" are small snippets of data (text files) that are stored in the web browser on your device in order to remember information about you. Cookies are used to compile anonymous, aggregate statistics based information collected through the Site or EarthRanger Products (“Aggregate Data”). Ai2 uses cookies to administer and operate the Site and EarthRanger Products, including site configuration and IT security. Ai2 also uses cookies with Google Analytics and Google Tag Manager (referred together as “Google Web Tools”) for feedback and usage statistics to operate and improve the Site and EarthRanger Products. Ai2 uses use both “first party cookies” (cookies set by Ai2) and “third party cookies” (cookies from another domain) as follows:
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
“Strictly Necessary Cookies” are cookies that are necessary for a website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. We use Strictly Necessary Cookies, which are first party session cookies for load balancing so that visitor page requests are routed to the same server in any browsing session. Session cookies are stored in temporary memory and erased when you close your web browser.
Performance Cookies.
“Performance Cookies” are cookies that allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of a website.
Targeting Cookies.
“Targeting Cookies” are third party cookies that log the record and activity of websites you visit, such as the links you click. We employ Targeting Cookies with Google Analytics. These cookies send you a cookie file with a unique identifier, which is tracked with other cookies stored in your browser to log your browsing history over time. For more information about how Google Analytics uses cookies, please review the
Google Analytics Cookie Guide
.
Tags.
We use third party JavaScript tags (code elements), to set the Performance Cookies. We manage the tags using Google Tag Manager, which is a tag management tool that integrates with Google Analytics to derive usage statistics and performance analytics.
Additional Uses of Cookies
Purpose
Description
Authentication
We use cookies and similar technologies to recognize you when you visit our SaaS Service or Site.
If you’re signed in, these technologies help us show you the right information and personalize your experience in line with your settings. For example, cookies enable us to identify you and verify your account.
Security
We use cookies and similar technologies to make your interactions with our SaaS Service and Site faster and more secure.
For example, we use cookies to enable and support our security features, keep your account safe and to help us detect malicious activity and violations of our End User License Agreement.
Preferences, features, and services
We use cookies and similar technologies to enable the functionality of our SaaS Service and Site, such as helping you to fill out forms on our more easily and providing you with features, insights, and customized content in conjunction with our plugins. We also use these technologies to remember information about your browser and your preferences.
For example, cookies can tell us which language you prefer and what your communication preferences are. We may also use local storage to speed up site functionality.
Analytics and research
We or our service providers use these technologies to understand, improve, and research products, features and services, including as you navigate through our Site or when you access our Site from other sites, applications, or devices. We or our service providers use these technologies to determine and measure whether you have interacted with our websites, content, or emails, and provide analytics based on those interactions.
We also use these technologies to provide aggregated information to our vendors or partners.
If you have an account with us but are logged out of your account on a browser, we may still continue to log your interaction with our SaaS Service or Site on that browser until the expiration of the cookie in order to generate usage analytics for our SaaS Service or Site. We may share these analytics in aggregate form with our vendors and partners.
‍
How Your Information May Be Shared
Please see below on the circumstances where Ai2 may share your personal information with others:
Service Providers:
Ai2 may use third party providers to provide or support some of the services that are available through the Site and EarthRanger Products. Ai2 may also rely on third party providers to perform certain services for Ai2 in connection with your use of the Site and EarthRanger Products, such as, but not limited to, communications and hosting services, network security, technical and user support, tracking and reporting functions, quality assurance testing, and other functions. Ai2 may share your information with these third party providers so that they can perform their services or complete your requests. These third party providers may share information with Ai2 that they obtain from or about you in connection with providing their services or completing your requests. Some portions of the Site or EarthRanger Products may include web pages that utilize framing techniques to serve content to you from our third party providers, while preserving the look and feel of the Site and/or EarthRanger Products. In such cases, please note that the information you provide is being provided to the third party.
Business Transfers:
Ai2 may share your information with its affiliated entities, prospective buyers, partners or joint ventures, in which case Ai2 will require them to honor this Privacy Policy. If another company acquires Ai2 or all or substantially all of its assets (e.g. merger, acquisition or sale), that company will possess the same information, and will assume the rights and obligations with respect to that information as described in this Privacy Policy.
Investigations:
Ai2 may investigate and disclose your personal information if it has a good faith belief that such disclosure (a) is reasonably necessary to comply with legal process and law enforcement instructions and orders, such as a search warrant, subpoena, statute, judicial proceeding, or other legal process served on Ai2; (b) is helpful to prevent, investigate, or identify possible fraud wrongdoing in connection with the Site or EarthRanger Products; (c) is necessary to act under exigent circumstances to protect the safety of the public or users of the Site or EarthRanger Products, (d) is reasonably necessary to protect Ai2’s rights, reputation, property, or that of its users, affiliates, partners or the public.
Links:
The Site and EarthRanger Products may contain links to unaffiliated third party services. If you visit any websites through those links, the collection and use of your information will be subject to such third party’s terms and privacy policy. Ai2 is not responsible for the privacy practices of such third party services. Please review the privacy policies posted on any such third party services.
‍
Managing your information
Google Web Tools
You can manage how your information is shared and used with Google Web Tools as follows:
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on.
Google has developed a browser add-on tool to enable visitors of websites with Google cookies and tags to prevent Google Analytics from receiving their information. This add-on will not prevent websites from collecting information through other first-party or third-party cookies and tags. You can download and install the
Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on
to begin using this tool.
Google settings.
In addition to above, you can manage how Google uses the information obtained through Google Web Tools and other cookies, and how it interacts with other Google products by changing the settings in your Google account. For example, you can restrict personalization features used in Google ads by changing your preference settings in your Google account to prevent use for targeted ads and content. Please review
Google’s Privacy Controls
for more general information on how you can configure various privacy and share settings through Google.
Third party tools.
Third parties have also developed mechanisms for opting out of various cookies that use and share information collected from Google Web Tools and other sources for advertising purposes. For US-based users, the
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) WebChoices
is a tool that enables you to view and manage the cookies used for online advertising. For EU-based users, there is
Your Online Choices
.
‍
Compliance
Information collected from the Site and EarthRanger Products will be stored and processed in either the United States, Singapore or Germany. Further, a Site may request which location of the three is used to store their Sites data. Where personal information is transferred from the European Economic Area (
“EEA”
) or Switzerland, we rely on appropriate safeguards to transfer the data. The data protection and other applicable laws of the United States or other countries may not be as comprehensive as those laws or regulations in your country and may otherwise differ from the data protection or consumer protection laws in such jurisdictions.
Security.
Ai2 is committed to protecting the security of your information and follows generally accepted industry standards to protect the personal information it receives. However, no method of transmission over the Internet, devices, or cloud or electronic storage is 100% secure. Therefore, while Ai2 strives to use commercially acceptable means to protect your personal information, Ai2 cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Personal Information of Children.
The Site and EarthRanger Products are intended for a general audience, and Ai2 does not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16. If you become aware that a child has provided Ai2 with personal information without parental consent, please contact Ai2 at legal@allenai.org. If Ai2 becomes aware that a child under 16 has provided personal information without parental consent, Ai2 will take steps to delete such data as soon as possible.
European Union (EU) Residents: Your Privacy Rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
If you are located in the EU, we will collect personal information only if Ai2 has one or more legal bases for doing so under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). The legal bases depend on your interaction with the Site and EarthRanger Products. Ai2 will only collect personal information from you where: (i) you have given your consent for one or more specific purposes; (ii) it is necessary to perform a contract we are about to enter into or have entered into with you or your employer/organization; (iii) it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests; (iv) it is necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another natural person; or (v) it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation. Where we rely on your consent to process personal information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and where we rely on legitimate interests, you may have the right to object to our processing.
Data Subject Rights.
If you are located in the EU, you can submit a request regarding your personal information to legal@allenai.org. To submit a request, you must provide certain information such as your first name, last name and email address, your relationship to Ai2, and details about your request. Ai2 will only use the information you provide to evaluate, process, fulfill or contact you regarding your request (e.g. to follow up or ask for additional details about your request). If the GDPR applies to your personal information, Ai2 will provide an initial response within one (1) month of your submission date. Please note that if you provide incorrect or insufficient information, Ai2 may not be able to fulfill your request.
Account Termination and Data Retention.
You may close your User Account by contacting Ai2 at support@earthranger.com. Subject to fulfillment of any requests regarding your personal information as provided in the “Data Subject Rights” section above, Ai2 may retain your personal information for the purposes as described in this Privacy Policy unless prohibited by law.
‍
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Ai2 may change this privacy policy from time to time. Laws, regulations and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our business. We will post the changes to this page and encourage you to review our privacy policy to stay informed. If we change the policy in a material and retroactive manner, Ai2 will provide additional notice, such as via email or through the Site and/or EarthRanger Products. If you disagree with the changes to this privacy policy, you should deactivate your account and immediately cease using the Site and EarthRanger Products.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our SaaS Service or Applications after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
‍
‍
Contact
For any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact Ai2 at
legal@allenai.org
.
Sub-policy 5
https://allenai.org/privacy-policy:
Ai2 Privacy Policy
Ai2 Privacy Policy & Notice
Last Updated: February 19, 2025
The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence (“
Ai2
” or “
we
”) is committed to maintaining your confidence and trust with respect to your privacy. Ai2 is a nonprofit research institution recognized as tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the U.S. tax code, and is organized and operated for charitable, scientific, and educational purposes under state and federal law. Please read this Privacy Policy & Notice (this “
Privacy Notice
”) carefully to understand how we collect, store, use, share, and disclose personal data (i.e., personal information) from and about you or our Users (as defined below) in connection with our Services, as defined in our posted
Terms of Use
(the “Services”). Ai2 is the data controller for purposes of processing of your personal data, if any, when you use the Services or our Sites (as defined below). For information on how to contact Ai2 as the data controller, please see the ‘Contact Us’ section below.
You must accept our binding Terms, as defined in our posted
Terms of Use
, to use our Sites and the Services, and are strongly encouraged to read the Terms in addition to this Privacy Notice.
About this Privacy Notice
This Privacy Notice applies only to this website (allenai.org) and our other websites, apps (including our mobile apps provided through various App Stores, including Apple’s App Store and Google’s Play), services, and events, including events that refer or link to this Privacy Notice (each, a “
Site
” and together, collectively, the “
Sites
”), and to any other personal information obtained when you email, interact, or otherwise communicate with Ai2 or use our Sites.
This Privacy Notice describes the types of information we collect through our Sites, how we use such information, and to whom and under what circumstances we may disclose it, including how we share any personal data that we may collect with third-party companies or service providers that help us process information and support our Sites and the Services (collectively, “
Third-Party Providers
”). It also describes your choices regarding use, access, and correction of your personal information as well as your data subject rights if you are an individual residing in the European Economic Area and/or the United Kingdom.
When you access our Sites on any computer, mobile phone, tablet, or other device (collectively, “
Device
”) or otherwise interact with Ai2 or our Sites, this Privacy Notice applies. Please read this Privacy Notice carefully to understand our practices about how we collect, use and share your personal information. This Privacy Notice may be supplemented by additional privacy statements, terms, or notices provided to you.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to any third-party applications or software that integrates with our Sites, the Services, or any other third-party products, services, or research, including without limitation the publisher of the app stores where you may download or otherwise access our Sites (collectively, “
Third-Party Services
”). The organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) that entered into any end-user license or other service agreement with Ai2 (in each case, the “
User
”) controls the content submitted through our Sites and any associated User Data, as defined in the applicable agreement (in each case, the “
User Agreement
”).
Changes to this Privacy Notice
Ai2 may change this Privacy Notice from time to time. Laws, regulations, and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our research or educational programs. We will post the changes to this page and encourage you to review our Privacy Notice to stay informed. In general, we will endeavor to provide prompt additional notice (e.g., via email or through the Sites) one month prior to the date the changes will become effective, if such changes are substantial. If you disagree with the changes to this Privacy Notice, you should deactivate your account and immediately cease using our Sites.
Categories of Information We Collect
We collect personal data about you and our Users in three ways: (i) information provided directly to us by you or our Users; (ii) information provided to us from third-party sources; and (iii) information collected by automated technologies when you use our Sites or the Services.
Information provided directly to us
: We explain here what categories of personal data we collect directly from you or our Users, the source of this information and purpose of collection, and the recipients of this information (if any), and the legal basis for collecting and processing this information:
A.
Contact information
: This category of personal data includes name, email address, postal address, phone number, social media handle, or Open Researcher and Contributor ID (ORCID), if applicable.
Source
: From you or our Users when they visit our Sites, call us, sign-up for emails or another service, or otherwise interact with the Services or engage with us on social media platforms.
Purpose
: To communicate with and respond to our you and our Users about the Services we offer, our support for the Services, to provide our Services, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, including verification of identity or to meet legal obligations.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers that help us with selected marketing, information technology, or research and development services.
Legal Basis
: To provide you with the Services or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, or based on prior consent by you or our Users when accessing, engaging, or using our Sites and the Services (when and if such consent is requested).
B.
Account information and preferences (if requested and provided by you or our Users)
: This category of personal data includes account login credentials, such as usernames and passwords, password hints and similar security information; other account registration and profile information, including educational, professional and other background information, such as your field of study, current position, affiliation, academic homepage, practice area and areas of interests, and photo; communications preferences, such as your preferred language and the frequency, type and format of the alerts you sign up to receive. Please note that these account information and preferences are not collected through all our Sites and only if you use our Sites and Services.
Source
: If and to the extent that we collect this account information and preferences, we collect them from you or our Users when you register for or update an account on our Sites (if any), use accounts on our Sites, or otherwise interact with us, you, or other Users in connection with accounts on our Sites or the Services.
Purpose
: To allow you and our Users to register and maintain their accounts and for us to provide the Services to you or our Users, to deliver communications and otherwise assist with accounts, to provide and support our Sites, and to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers who help us facilitate account log in and with website analytics, marketing, and activity on our Sites and access to the Services.
Legal Basis
: To support your access to and use of certain portions or functionality of the Services, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement
C.
User submissions
: This category of personal data includes information that you or our Users communicate to us, such as questions or information you or our users send to us at
ai2-info@allenai.org
,
feedback@semanticscolar.org
,
legal@allenai.org
, as well as information communicated to us through our Sites, leaderboards, newsletter subscription, web forms and other online submissions; data that you or our Users provide to us as part of interacting with our Services, including for example your saved papers, email alerts, favorites, search queries, and prompts you enter into our AI demonstrations on our Sites and the information included in such prompts, and other information you or our Users consent to providing us to access and use the Services.
Source
: From directly from you or our Users when they use our Sites, call us, communicate with us, sign-up for emails or another service, or otherwise interact with us or the AI demonstrations on our Sites or the Services.
Purpose
: Improve the Sites and our Services, respond to queries, and inform you and our Users about new services, to support the Sites and provide you with the Services, to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, and also identify new potential users and partners.
Potential Recipients
: Third-Party Providers that help us with selected marketing, information technology, or research and development services. Should you decide to share the prompts you have entered into our AI demonstrations, those inputs may be first transmitted to one of our partners who collects this data on our behalf and then passes it on to us so that we can review your prompts to improve the Services and conduct research and educational programs.
Legal Basis
: Our legitimate interest to manage, protect and ensure the integrity and security of our Sites as well as to improve the Services provided on our Sites. The processing of this information will be carried out to support you or Users of the Sites, or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement, for example, if we communicate with you in relation to our Sites or the Services (e.g. responses to user submission or requests), or if we store data provided by You or our Users in the course of using of our Sites or the Services (e.g. papers, email alerts, favorites, or search queries). When you register for our newsletter, we process your personal data exclusively on the basis of your consent. Insofar as you provide us with prompts you enter into our AI demonstrations, we process any personal data included in those prompts exclusively based on your consent and to improve our AI demonstrations for research and educational purposes.
D.
Browsing Information
: This category of personal data includes information such as: IP address; MAC address or other User identifier (e.g. IMEI number or International Mobile Equipment Identity Number); the unique number of the carrier (e.g. IMSI or International Mobile Subscriber Identity); mobile phone number (e.g. MSISDN or Mobile Station International Subscriber Directory Number); the kind of browser or computer you our Users use; the pages and content that you and our Users visit on our Sites, click on, view, or choose not to click on or view; the state and country from which you or our Users access our Sites; the date and time of visit, web pages you or our Users linked to our Sites from; and browsing and search history.
Source
: Our Sites and your interactions with the Sites, including through the use of cookies and other tracking technologies explained further below.
Purpose
: To evaluate usage of our Sites and improve performance of the Sites and our services; to protect the security and integrity of the Sites and our research or educational programs, such as preventing fraud, hacking, and other criminal activity or to meet legal obligations.
Potential Recipients
: Our Third-Party Providers who help us with fraud protection, website analytics, marketing, and activity on our Sites.
Legal Basis
: To manage, protect, and ensure the integrity and security of our Sites as well as to improve the Services.
E.
Suspected crime information
: This category of personal data includes information such as you our Users’ identity, image, name, and address, suspected or alleged thefts, fraud, assault or other criminal behavior.
Source
: From crime and fraud prevention agencies, from you or our Users, witnesses, and from the police or law enforcement authorities.
Purpose
: To protect you, our Users, the public, and our research or educational programs against risks and crime.
Potential Recipients
: Law enforcement and other governmental authorities in accordance with applicable law, and our professional advisors.
Legal Basis
: To protect you, our Users, third parties, and us from crimes, fraud, and to ensure the integrity and security of our Sites. The processing of this information is based on, and necessary for, complying with legal obligations and requirements applicable to us that may arise from, for example, a request from law enforcement or other governmental authority to share this category of information. When we share this category of information with our professional advisors, the processing is based on our legitimate interests in protecting you, our Users, and our Sites and the Services.
Third-Party Sources
: We also may obtain personal data and other information about you or our Users from our affiliates and subsidiaries, as well as from third parties, including: (1) Third-Party Providers; and (2) publicly-available sources and data suppliers from which we obtain data to validate or supplement the information we hold or to otherwise use in connection with operating our Sites, the Services, and our research or educational programs.
A. This category of personal data includes information we gather from public websites, author name information, affiliation, email addresses (from our publisher partners, aggregated data from our Third-Party Providers, metadata from conference partnerships or other providers, and web crawls. This data may be combined with other information we collect and might include aggregate level data, such as which IP addresses correspond to zip codes or countries.
B. Typically, Third-Party Services are software that integrates with our Sites, and User can permit their authorized users to enable and disable these integrations. Once enabled, the provider of Third-Party Services may share certain information with Ai2. Authorized users should check the privacy settings and notices in these Third-Party Services to understand what data may be disclosed to Ai2. When Third-Party Services are enabled, Ai2 is authorized to connect and access other information made available to Ai2 in accordance with our agreement with the Third-Party Provider. Ai2 does not, however, receive or store passwords for any of these Third-Party Services when connecting them to our Sites.
Automated Technologies
: Our Sites may also automatically collect information about how you and our Users to interact with the Sites, and the Devices you and our Users use to access and use the Services. such as:
A. This category of personal data includes information includes:
Device and connection information, including IP address, browser type and version, operating system and other software installed on the Device accessing the Site or the Services, unique Device identifier, and other technical identifiers;
Usage data and performance information, including settings selected, features used, URL clickstream data, date and time stamp information, referring and exit pages, pages visited, error reports, and performance data, and other activity logs on the Sites;
For educational Sites, the course modules and test questions viewed, answered, or completed; and
For location-aware Sites, the physical location of the Device.
B. We collect and process this data based on our legitimate interests described in the ‘How We Use Collected Information’ section, based on prior consent by you or our Users (to the extent that this data contains personal data), or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement.
How We Use Collected Information
We may use your personal data and the information we collected as permitted or required by law, as described in more detail in this section.
Legitimate Interests
: We may process the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for the purpose of advancing any of the following interests, programs, or activities:
A. To conduct scientific research and to educate the general public;
B. To operate, enhance, and improve our Sites, the Services, and develop new programs and services supported by the Sites, and to develop and provide search, learning, and productivity tools and additional features on our Sites and with the Services.
C. To provide our Sites and the Services to you, to communicate with you about your use of our Sites and the Services, to respond to your inquiries, provide you with documentation or communications you requested and for other user service purposes (e.g., technical support, responding to queries or complaints);
D. To tailor the content and information that we may send or display to you and our Users, such as customized content and other personalization to make our Site and the Services more efficient for you and more relevant to your interests and geography, personalized help and instructions, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites and the Services;
E. To administer and manage performance of agreements with our Third-Party Providers or any User Agreements our Users;
F. To evaluate, maintain, monitor performance, and troubleshoot our Sites and the Services (including by monitoring and analyzing usage trends, access to, and use of our Sites and the Services), and to conduct data analysis or statistical inference about use of our Sites and the Services, including for the purposes of future research and development, audits, reporting, business operations, and other scientific or educational purposes;
G. For marketing and promotional purposes, for example, we may use your email address to send you news and newsletters, special offers, promotions, or to otherwise contact you about our Sites, the Services, or information we think may interest you;
H. To better understand how users access and use our Sites and the Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis, in order to improve our Sites and the Services and respond to user desires and preferences, and for other research, scientific, educational, and analytical purposes;
I. To administer surveys and questionnaires;
J. To protect and ensure the quality, security integrity and safety of our Sites and the Services, our operations, and our confidential and proprietary technology and information;
K. To prevent, detect, investigate, and address actual or suspected fraud, violation of law or our Terms, claims and other liabilities, or any threat of physical or financial harm to u, our staff or any other individuals or entities; and
L. As may be otherwise disclosed at the time of collection.
Enforcement of Our Rights
: We may process the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for the purpose of protecting and defending our rights, property, or safety of Ai2 or third parties, including enforcing contracts or policies, or in connection with investigating and preventing fraud or security issues, in the following ways:
A. Provide technical, demonstration, and other support and help to keep our Sites and the Services working, safe and secure;
B. Investigate and help prevent security issues and abuse;
C. Conduct and administer user testing and surveys;
D. Prevent or address service errors;
E. Address security or technical issues; and/or
F. Contact you to inform you about in our Sites, the Services, and other important Site-related notices (e.g. security, fraud, or change notices).
Legal and Corporate Compliance
: We may use the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements required by applicable law, legal process or regulation (including addressing access requests).
Scientific, Research, and Educational Purposes
: Ai2 may use the information listed above in ‘Categories of Information We Collect’ for any business purpose, including without limitation Ai2’s scientific research and educational purposes, provided that the information we collect is aggregated or de-identified so it is no longer reasonably associated with an identified or identifiable natural person. Our Users determine their own policies and practices for the sharing and disclosure of information. Ai2 does not control how the Users or any other third parties choose to share or disclose information.
Cookies
Like many websites, Ai2 analyzes how visitors use our Sites through what is known as “cookie” technology or similar tracking tools (“
Cookies
”). A Cookie can be a small text file that is placed on your computer when you access our Sites and allows us to recognize you each time you visit the Sites. We may use cookies to: (i) allow you to use our Sites without having to re-enter your username and password; (ii) enhance or personalize your Site usage and experience; (iii) monitor and track your Site usage; (iv) manage our Sites; and (v) understand, improve, and research AI demonstrations, features and services, including to create logs and record when you access our Sites from different Devices, such as your work computer or your mobile device, and to provide you with interest-based ads. For more information on our advertising, see below: ‘Interest-Based Advertising.’ Unless the cookies are technically necessary and unless otherwise stated, we only use cookies with your prior consent. Further information on the cookies we use and the data processed through the use of these cookies can be found in our cookie notice below.
You can control cookies through your browser’s settings and other tools. However, if you choose to block certain cookies, you may not be able to register, login, or access certain parts or make full use of the pages and features that are currently on our Sites, or that we may put on our Sites in the future. Note that browser-management tools for cookies are outside of our control and we cannot guarantee their effectiveness. We may combine the information we collect through cookies, web beacons, or other technology tools with other information we have collected from you or information from other sources.
Interest-Based Advertising
We may use third-party advertising companies that use tracking technologies to serve our advertisements across the Internet. These companies may collect information about your visits to and use of our Sites and other websites and your interaction with our advertising and other communications. These advertising companies serve ads on behalf of us and others on non-affiliated sites, and some of those ads may be personalized, meaning that they are intended to be relevant to you based on information collected about your visits to the Sites and elsewhere over time.
You have the choice to tell us not to collect and use this information, and in some jurisdictions, we will only engage in interest-based advertising if you opt-in. If you would like more information about this practice and to know your choices concerning interest-based ads, visit:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
or
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
Should you reside in the European Union or the United Kingdom, with your prior express consent, we may use the following tracking technologies to serve our advertisements across the internet and tailored to your interests.
Google Analytics
: We may use the ‘Google Analytics’ analysis tool on our Sites, a web tracking service provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA (“
Google
”). The purpose of our use of the tool is to enable the analysis of your and our Users’ interactions on websites and in apps and to improve our offers and make them more interesting for you and our Users by means of the statistics and reports obtained.
We primarily use cookies, Device and browser data, IP addresses, and our Sites activities to track the interaction between you/our Users and the Sites. Google Analytics also records your IP addresses to ensure the security of the service and to provide us with information about the country, region or city from which the respective user originates (so-called IP localization). However, for your protection, we use the anonymization function (IP masking), i.e. Google shortens the IP addresses within the European Union/European Economic Area by the last octet.
Regarding the collection and processing of your personal data, Google acts as an independent controller within the meaning of Article 4(7) of the GDPR.
Further information on the scope of Google Analytics’ services can be found at:
https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/analytics/terms/us/
.
Information on data processing when using Google Analytics is provided by Google at the following link:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en&sjid=18322672776052043081-EU
.
General information on data processing, which according to Google also apply to Google Analytics, can be found in Google's privacy policy at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de
.
The legal basis for the collection and further processing of the information, which takes place for a maximum of 14 months, is your prior consent. You can withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. In apps, you can reset the advertising ID in the Android or iOS settings. The easiest way to withdraw consent is to notify us or to install the Google browser add-on, which is available via the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de/
.
Please note that the level of data protection outside the European Union and the European Economic Area may not be the same as in the European Union. In particular, if the data is transferred to the United States, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes.
Google relies on the European Commission's adequacy decisions in accordance with Art. 45 GDPR to justify the legality of the transfer of your personal data to third countries.
These adequacy decisions can be accessed on the following website of the European Commission, available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en
.
In particular, for the transfer of your personal data to the United States, Google relies on its certification under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, available at:
https://commission.europa.eu/system/files/2023-07/Adequacy%20decision%20EU-US%20Data%20Privacy%20Framework_en.pdf
.
In its privacy policy, Google states that, by means of this certification, it has declared its compliance with the principles of the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and its recognition of the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission.
The certification applies in particular to Google LLC and its subsidiaries in the United States (unless these are expressly excluded) and can be reviewed at:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/participant-detail?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active0000001L5AAI&status=Active&hl=de
.
If the European Commission has not issued an adequacy decision with respect to the recipient state to which your personal data is transferred, Google will base the lawfulness of the transfer to companies based in such states on the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission and agreed with the recipient companies.
YouTube Video Embeds
: With your consent, we may use the YouTube plugin, provided by YouTube LLC, 01 Cherry Ave., San Bruno, CA 94066, USA (hereinafter ‘YouTube’). We use the YouTube plug-in to embed YouTube videos on our Sites (if applicable). When you visit our Sites, your browser or Device connects to YouTube's servers. This may result in personal data being stored and evaluated, in particular your activity and our Users’ activity (in particular which websites and (sub-)pages have been visited and which elements have been clicked on) as well as Device and browser information (in particular the IP address and operating system). This may cause data being transferred to Google servers in the United States. We have no influence on the content of the plug-in. If you are logged into your YouTube account while visiting our Sites and we use the YouTube Plugin on the Site visited, YouTube can associate your online presence visit with your account. By interacting with this plug-in, the corresponding information is transmitted directly to YouTube and stored there. YouTube can store your data as a user profile and use it for advertising and marketing, as well as for the customized design of its website.
Further information on the collection and storage of data by Google can be found here:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=DE&hl=en
We use YouTube to improve user-friendliness and to present our Sites in an appealing way.
The legal basis for the collection and further processing of the information is your prior consent. You can withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. In apps, you can reset the advertising ID in the Android or iOS settings. The easiest way to withdraw consent is to notify us or to install the Google browser add-on, which is available via the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de/
.
Please note that the level of data protection outside the European Union and the European Economic Area may not be the same as in the European Union. In particular, if the data is transferred to the United States, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes.
Since the YouTube plugin is operated in Europe by Google Ireland Ltd., the above information concerning the transfer of your personal data to third countries outside the EU and the EEA by Google, in particular regarding the existence of an adequacy decision and the use of standard contractual clauses, apply accordingly.
No Obligation to Provide Personal Data
You and our Users are under no legal or contractual obligation to provide us with your personal data; however, we may be limited in our ability to provide certain Sites or the Services or even be unable to provide them at all if you do not provide the necessary data. We will indicate whether the provision of personal data is required either by law or by contract, as applicable, upon collection.
Disclosure of Your Information
Ai2 may disclose your personal information depending on the way you or our Users interact with us, our Sites, and the Services. We may disclose information collected from and about you as follows:
To our related companies and Third-Party Providers, to perform research or educational activities, to provide professional or technical support function for us and to provide you with the Services or to perform our commitments under an applicable User Agreement;
With your consent, to our marketing partners or Third-Party Providers in connection with marketing our current and future product and service offerings;
Based on our legitimate interest and as necessary if we believe that there has been a violation of any Site terms of use or of our rights or the rights of any third party;
In order to comply with our legal obligations, we disclose your personal data to respond to legal process (such as a search warrant, subpoena or court order) and provide information to law enforcement agencies or in connection with an investigation on matters related to public safety, as permitted by law, or otherwise as required by law; and
In the event that substantially all of Ai2’s assets are acquired, your personal information may be one of the transferred assets. Any data processing in this instance is based on our legitimate interests in transferring our assets.
We may also disclose your personal information with your express consent. If information is aggregated or de-identified so it is no longer reasonably associated with an identified or identifiable natural person, Ai2 may share it with third parties without restriction. Please note that if you voluntarily submit any personal information for posting on our Sites or through the Services in a public forum (e.g. comments on a blog post), such public interactions with Ai2 on our Sites or through the Services will make that information publicly available and can be collected and used by others; accordingly, please use care before posting information about yourself or any User online. We cannot control the actions of others with whom you may choose to share your information, and Ai2 cannot and does not guarantee that your information shared in a public forum on our Sites or through the Services will not be viewed by unauthorized persons. You understand that when you use public areas of our Sites or the Services, your information and any User information will be available to other users in some cases may be publicly available. We are not responsible for the personal information you choose to share in these public areas or for the actions of any third parties with whom you share personal information.
Access, Correction, and Deletion, Data Subject Rights under the GDPR
We respect your right to access and correct your personal information. You may exercise your rights, subject to applicable laws, to request that we delete or restrict access to your personal data. We may need to retain it for legally permitted purposes and this will be explained to you if necessary. In addition, if you have claimed your author page in our Semantic Scholar service (“
Semantic Scholar
”) as described in the ‘Service Specific Details’ section below, you may access your personal information by signing into your account. From there, you can correct or modify your information. If you need assistance correcting or updating your personal information, or would like to request that we delete your personal information, please contact us using the contact information detailed in the ‘Contact’ section below.
Provided that you reside in the European Economic Area or the United Kingdom, or that GDPR otherwise applies, you have the following data subject rights in accordance with the EU GDPR (EU Regulation no. 2016/679) or UK GDPR (UK Data Protection Act 2018) (together, along with any revision or substation thereof, “
GDPR
”):
Right to access personal data.
You have a right to request that we provide you with a copy of your personal data that we hold and you have the right to be informed of: (a) the controller’s identity; (b) the purposes, legal basis and methods of processing; (c) the source of your personal data; (d) the entities or categories of entities to whom your personal data may be transferred; and (e) where possible, the envisaged period for which the personal data will be stored, or, if not possible, the criteria used to determine that period. In order to submit such request, please see the ‘Contact’ section below.
Right to rectify or erase personal data.
You have a right to request that we rectify inaccurate personal data. We may seek to verify the accuracy of the personal data before rectifying it. You can also request that we erase your personal data in limited circumstances where:
it is no longer needed for the purposes for which it was collected as described above;
you have withdrawn your consent (where the processing was based on consent), and where there is no other legal ground for the processing;
you successfully lodged a right to object (see ‘Right to Object’ section below);
it has been processed unlawfully; or
needed to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject.
We are not required to comply with your request to erase personal data if the processing of your personal data is necessary:
for compliance with a legal obligation; or
for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; or
for performance of a contract.
Right to restrict the processing of your personal data.
You can ask us to restrict your personal data, where:
its accuracy is contested, to allow us to verify its accuracy;
the processing is unlawful, but you do not want it erased;
it is no longer needed for the purposes for which it was collected, but we still need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
you have exercised the right to object, and verification of overriding grounds is pending.
We can continue to use your personal data following a request for restriction, where:
we have your consent;
to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or
to protect the rights of another natural or legal person.
Right to transfer your personal data.
You can ask us to provide your personal data to you in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, or you can ask to have it transferred directly to another controller, where:
the processing is based on your consent or the performance of a contract with you; and
the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to object to the processing of your personal data.
You can object to any processing of your personal data which has our legitimate interests as its legal basis, if you believe your fundamental rights and freedoms outweigh our legitimate interests. If you raise an objection, we have an opportunity to demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate interests which override your rights and freedoms.
Right to object to how we use your personal data for direct marketing purposes.
You can request that we change the manner in which we contact you for marketing Purposes. You can request that we do not transfer your personal data to unaffiliated third parties for the Purposes of direct marketing or any other purposes.
Right to obtain a copy of personal data safeguards used for transfers outside your jurisdiction.
You can ask to obtain a copy of, or reference to, the safeguards under which your personal data is transferred outside of the European Economic Area or the UK. We may redact data transfer agreements to protect commercial terms.
Right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority.
You have a right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority (a list of EU and UK national data protection authorities can be found
here
(EU) and
here
(UK)) if you have concerns about how we are processing your personal data. We ask that you please attempt to resolve any issues with us first, although you have a right to contact your supervisory authority at any time.
Your Rights and Choices.
Subject to certain exemptions, and in some cases dependent upon the processing we are undertaking, you have certain rights in relation to your personal data. We may ask you for additional information to confirm your identity and for security purposes, before disclosing the personal data requested to you. We reserve the right to charge a fee where permitted by law, for instance if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive.
You can exercise your rights through any means, including by contacting us at
legal@allenai.org
. Subject to legal and other permissible considerations, we will make every reasonable effort to honor your request promptly or inform you if we require further information in order to fulfil your request.
In accordance with Art. 21 GDPR, you have the right to object to the processing of your data, provided that the reason for the objection arises from your particular situation and it concerns data that we process to protect one of our interests worthy of protection or if it concerns the use of your data for direct marketing.
If you have given us consent to process your personal data, you can withdraw this consent at any time without providing reasons and with effect for the future at the email address provided above under the contact details.
No Fee Usually Required.
We do not charge a fee to give you access to your personal data or to exercise any of the other rights described above. We may, however, charge a reasonable fee if your request for access is clearly unfounded or excessive or we may refuse to comply with the request.
Data Retention
We retain your personal information that we collect, access or process only for as long as necessary for the fulfillment of the purposes for which it was collected unless otherwise provided in agreements between you and Ai2 or as required or authorized by law (in particular as required by statutory retention periods). Personal information that is no longer required to fulfill the identified purposes will be destroyed, erased or made de-identified.
Data Security
We work hard to protect information you provide from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access or disclosure. We consider the sensitivity of the information we collect, process and store, and the current state of technology. We follow generally accepted standards designed to protect the information submitted to us, both during transmission and once it is received. Given the nature of communications and information processing technology, Ai2 cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, will be absolutely safe from intrusion by others. The safety and security of your information also depends on you. Where Ai2 has given you (or where you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Sites, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share your password with anyone, and we urge you to be careful about giving out information in public areas of the websites like message boards. The information you share in public areas may be viewed by any user of our Sites.
Third-Party Websites
The Sites may contain links to, or other options to redirect to or integrate with, third-party websites, such as (but not limited to) social media sites like Facebook and X (formerly known as Twitter), which may have privacy policies that differ from our own. We are not responsible for the activities and practices that take place on these websites. Accordingly, we recommend that you review the privacy policy posted on any external site before disclosing any personal information. Please contact those websites directly if you have any questions about their privacy policies.
Locations of Processing
Your information will be stored and processed by Ai2 in the United States. We take steps, including through contracts, to ensure that the information continues to be protected wherever it is located in a manner consistent with the standards of protection required under applicable law. If you are visiting our Sites from outside the United States, your information may be transferred to, stored and processed in the United States or other countries in accordance with this Privacy Notice. Where personal information is transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or Switzerland, we rely on appropriate safeguards such as the European Commission-approved Standard Contractual Clauses and Data Privacy Frameworks to transfer the data and/or as otherwise authorized by applicable law. The data protection and other applicable laws of the United States or other countries may not be as comprehensive as those laws or regulations in your country or may otherwise differ from the data protection or consumer protection laws in your country. Your information may be available to government authorities under lawful orders and law applicable in such jurisdictions. Further information on the safeguards implemented by us, can be requested by email at:
legal@allenai.org
.
Contact
If you have any questions, comments, complaints or requests regarding this Privacy Notice or our processing of your information, please contact us at the following:
By Mail:
The Allen Institute for Artificial Intelligence
2157 North Northlake Way, Suite 110
Seattle, WA. 98103
Attn: Legal Department
By Email:
legal@allenai.org
If we need, or are required, to contact you concerning this Privacy Notice or any event that involves your information, we may do so by email, or mail.
Children Under the Age of 16
Our Sites are not intended for children under 16 years of age. No one under age 16 may provide any information to or on our Sites. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16 without verifiable parental consent. If you are under 16, do not use or provide any information on our Sites or on or through any of its features, make any purchases through the Sites, use any of the interactive or public comment features of this Sites or provide any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, e-mail address or any screen name or username you may use. If you believe we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us using the contact information detailed in the ‘Contact’ section above and we will delete that information immediately.
Service-Specific Details
Semantic
Scholar
: Please read the service-specific details below for additional information about Ai2’s project, Semantic Scholar (
https://www.semanticscholar.org/
), which apply to Semantic Scholar in addition to this Privacy Notice:
A. We collect author names as publicly accessible metadata from the web, publishers, and other sources for display across our website including in association with papers, presentations, blog posts, code repositories, videos and citations/references. This data and content can be removed for display from our public-facing website by removing the associated content (note: we currently only have removal tools for presentations, papers, figures and tables). Removal does not result in deletion of the underlying paper or publication attributed to the author, which is fixed by the original source material.
B. We use the author name from this publicly accessible metadata to auto-generate author pages where we display content associated with an author, compute citation statistics and display links to other authors.
C. Author profile pages can be updated by using the ‘Claim Author Page’ button on an author’s page to add/remove papers, add an affiliation, add a link to a homepage and add an ORCID ID to an author’s profile. Requesters who submit changes are required to provide their first and last name, e-mail address and justification which we store in a database to validate the request. You have the ability to un-claim a profile.
D. We provide multiple options to sign in via third-party providers such as, for example, Google, Facebook, Twitter, and OpenAthens. As part of the sign-in process we collect and store the data such as username, screen name, auth token, affiliation. Please contact us if you’d like further information about the data provided by your sign in provider.
Skylight
. For information about how we collect, use and share your personal information in connection with our Skylight services, please review the
Skylight Privacy Policy
.
EarthRanger
. For information about how we collect, use, and share your personal information in connection with our EarthRanger services, please review the
EarthRanger Privacy Policy
.
Version History
February 2025 (Current Version)
Update as of February 19, 2025.
July 2022
Transcription of existing privacy policy to MD, done as of July 21, 2022.
June 2021
Update as of June 1, 2021
August 2020
Update as of Aug 25, 2020
April 2020
Update as of April 2, 2020
July 2018
Original version.
Version History
February 2025
(Current Version)
Update as of February 19, 2025.
July 2022
Transcription of existing privacy policy to MD, done as of July 21, 2022.
June 2021
Update as of June 1, 2021
August 2020
Update as of Aug 25, 2020
April 2020
Update as of April 2, 2020
July 2018
Original version.
We must use local storage to remember your permissions. Can we also use cookies and external services according to our
privacy policy
to improve the browsing experience?
Manage Options
Reject All
Approve All